North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 1. The University of North Carolina.
§ 116-17.2.
Flexible Compensation Plan.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law relating to the salaries of employees of The University of North Carolina, the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina is authorized to provide a plan of flexible compensation to eligible employees of constituent institutions for benefits available under Section 125 and related sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as amended. This plan shall not include those benefits provided to employees under Articles 1, 3B, and 6 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes nor any vacation leave, sick leave, or any other leave that may be carried forward from year to year by employees as a form of deferred compensation. If a plan of flexible compensation is offered, then a TRICARE supplement shall be offered. In providing a plan of flexible compensation, the Board of Governors may authorize constituent institutions to enter into agreements with their employees for reductions in the salaries of employees electing to participate in the plan of flexible compensation provided by this section. With the approval of the Director of the Budget, savings in the employer’s share of contributions under the Federal Insurance Contributions Act on account of the reduction in salary may be used to pay some or all of the administrative expenses of the program. Should the Board of Governors decide to contract with a third party to administer the terms and conditions of a plan of flexible compensation as provided by this section, it may select such a contractor only upon a thorough and completely advertised competitive procurement process.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1059, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 14(h); 1993, c. 561, s. 42; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.28A; 1997-443, s. 33.20(a); 1999-237, s. 28.27(a); 2013-292, s. 3.

Cross References.

For flexible compensation plan for eligible officers and employees of State departments, institutions, and agencies not covered by the provisions of this section, see

G.S. 126-95

.

§ 116-17.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-56, s. 1, effective June 30, 2020.

History.

2017-57, s. 35.24; 2018-12, s. 1; repealed by 2020-56, s. 1, effective June 30, 2020.

§ 116-18.
Information Center established.

The Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina, with the cooperation of other concerned organizations, shall establish, as a function of the Board, an Educational Opportunities Information Center to provide information and assistance to prospective college and university students and to the several institutions, both public and private, on matters regarding student admissions, transfers and enrollments. The public institutions shall cooperate with the Center by furnishing such nonconfidential information as may assist the Center in the performance of its duties. Similar cooperation shall be requested of the private institutions in the State.

An applicant for admission to an institution who is not offered admission may request that the institution send to the Center appropriate nonconfidential information concerning his application. The Center may, at its discretion and with permission of the applicant, direct the attention of the applicant to other institutions and the attention of other institutions to the applicant. The Center is authorized to conduct such studies and analyses of admissions, transfers and enrollments as may be deemed appropriate.

History.

1971, c. 1086, s. 1; c. 1244, s. 4.

§§ 116-19 through 116-21.4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2012.

History.

116-19; 1971, c. 744, s. 1; c. 1244, s. 5; 1993, c. 321, s. 80(d); 2001-424, s. 31.1(b); 2002-69, s. 1; 2006-66, s. 9.13(a); repealed by 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2012. 116-20; 1971, c. 744, s. 2; c. 1244, s. 5; 1998-212, s. 11.10; 2006-66, s. 9.13(b); repealed by 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2012. 116-21; 1971, c. 744, s. 3; c. 1244, s. 5; 1993, c. 321, s. 80(e); repealed by 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2012. 116-21.1; 2001-424, s. 31.1(a); 2006-66, s. 9.13(c); repealed by 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2012. 116-21.2; 2001-424, s. 31.1(a); 2006-66, s. 9.13(d); 2007-323, s. 9.13(a); 2008-107, s. 9.11(a); 2009-451, s. 9.8(a); repealed by 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2012. 116-21.3; 2001-424, s. 31.1(a); 2006-66, s. 9.13(e); 2011-183, s. 82; repealed by 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2012. 116-21.4; 2001-424, s. 31.1(a); 2002-126, s. 9.6; 2006-66, s. 9.13(f); repealed by 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2012.

§ 116-21.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 9.15(a), effective July 1, 2009.

§ 116-21.6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 9.14, effective July 1, 2011.

History.

2009-451, s. 9.15(b); repealed by 2011-145, s. 9.14, effective July 1, 2011.

§ 116-22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2012.

History.

1971, c. 744, s. 4; c. 1244, s. 5; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 59; 1987, c. 830, s. 93(d); 2002-126, s. 9.11(a); 2002-159, s. 38; 2006-66, s. 9.13(g); repealed by 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), effective July 1, 2012.

§§ 116-22.1 through 116-25.
[Repealed]

Transferred to G.S. 116A-3 to 116A-7 by Session Laws 1971, c. 1135, s. 2.

§ 116-25.1.
Semester limitation on eligibility for The University of North Carolina need-based financial aid grants. [Repealed effective July 1, 2023 — see note]

Except as otherwise provided by this section, a student shall not receive a grant from The University of North Carolina Need-Based Financial Aid Program for more than 10 full-time academic semesters, or its equivalent if enrolled part-time, unless the student is enrolled in a program officially designated by the Board of Governors as a five-year degree program. If a student is enrolled in such a five-year degree program, then the student shall not receive a need-based grant from The University of North Carolina Need-Based Financial Aid Program for more than 12 full-time academic semesters or its equivalent if enrolled part-time.

Upon application by a student, the constituent institution may grant a waiver to the student who may then receive a grant for the equivalent of one additional full-time academic semester if the student demonstrates that any of the following have substantially disrupted or interrupted the student’s pursuit of a degree: (i) a military service obligation, (ii) serious medical debilitation, (iii) a short-term or long-term disability, or (iv) other extraordinary hardship. The Board of Governors shall establish policies and procedures to implement the waiver provided by this subsection.

History.

2011-145, s. 9.11(a); 2013-360, s. 11.15(d); repealed by 2021-180, s. 8A.2(i), effective July 1, 2023.

Delayed Repeal of Section.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(i), repealed this section effective July 1, 2023.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-25.1.
Semester limitation on eligibility for The University of North Carolina need-based financial aid grants.
[Repealed effective July 1, 2023]

History.

2011-145, s. 9.11(a); 2013-360, s. 11.15(d); repealed by 2021-180, s. 8A.2(i), effective July 1, 2023.

Delayed Repeal of Section.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(i), repealed this section effective July 1, 2023.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-26.
[Repealed]

Transferred to

G.S. 116-43

by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 17.

§ 116-27.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

§§ 116-28,
116-29.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 448, s. 7.

§ 116-29.1.
University Cancer Research Fund. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

Fund. — The University Cancer Research Fund is established as a special revenue fund in the Office of the President of The University of North Carolina. Allocations from the fund shall be made in the discretion of the Cancer Research Fund Committee and shall be used only for the purpose of cancer research under UNC Hospitals, the Lineberger Comprehensive Cancer Center, or both.

Effective July 1 of each calendar year, the funds remitted to the University Cancer Research Fund by the Secretary of Revenue from the tax on tobacco products other than cigarettes pursuant to

G.S. 105-113.40

A are appropriated for this purpose.

Cancer Research Fund Committee. — The Cancer Research Fund Committee shall consist of five ex officio members and two appointed members. The five ex officio members shall consist of the following: (i) one member shall be the Chancellor of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, (ii) one member shall be the Director of the Lineberger Comprehensive Cancer Center, (iii) one member shall be the Dean of the School of Medicine at The University of North Carolina, (iv) one member shall be the Dean of the School of Pharmacy at The University of North Carolina, and (v) one member shall be the Dean of the School of Public Health at The University of North Carolina. The remaining two members shall be appointed by a majority vote of the standing members of the Committee and shall be selected from persons holding a leadership position in a nationally prominent cancer program.If any of the specified positions cease to exist, then the successor position shall be deemed to be substituted in the place of the former one, and the person holding the successor position shall become an ex officio member of the Committee.

Chair. — The chair shall be the Chancellor of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.

Quorum. — A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Meetings. — The Committee shall meet at least once in each quarter and may hold special meetings at any time and place at the call of the chair or upon the written request of at least a majority of its members.

Report. — By November 1 of each year, the Cancer Research Fund Committee shall provide to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and to the Office of State Budget and Management an annual financial report which shall include the following components:

Accounting of expenditures of State funds related to strategic initiatives, development of infrastructure, and ongoing administrative functions.

Accounting of expenditures of extramural funds related to strategic initiatives, development of infrastructure, and ongoing administrative functions.

Measures of impact to the State’s economy in the creation of jobs, intellectual property, and start-up companies.

Other performance measures directly related to the investment of State funds.

Accounting of any fund balances retained by the Fund, along with information about any restrictions on the use of these funds.

History.

2007-323, s. 6.23(b); 2009-451, s. 27A.5(e); 2010-31, s. 9.12; 2011-145, ss. 6.11(c), 9.4; 2013-360, s. 6.4(d).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 42.9(i), made the amendments to subsection (b) of this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 42.9(h), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to sales or purchases occurring on or after that date, and futher provides: “This section does not affect the rights or liabilities of a taxpayer or another person arising under the law as it existed before the effective date of this section, nor does it affect the right to any refund or credit of a tax that accrued under the law as it existed before the effective date of this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 27A.5(e), effective September 1, 2009, substituted “G.S. 105-113.40A” for “G.S. 105-113.41” in subdivision (b)(2).

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 9.12, effective July 1, 2010, in the first paragraph in subsection (c) and in subsection (d), substituted “Chancellor of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill” for “President of The University of North Carolina.”

Session Laws 2011-145, ss. 6.11(c) and 9.4, effective July 1, 2011, rewrote subdivision (b)(1), which formerly read: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 143C-9-3

, of the funds credited to the Tobacco Trust Account, the sum of eight million dollars ($8,000,000) is transferred from the Tobacco Trust Account to the University Cancer Research Fund and appropriated for this purpose” and added subsection (g).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 6.4(d), effective July 1, 2013, rewrote subsection (b).

Session Laws, 2021-180, s. 42.9(h), in subsection (b), substituted “G.S. 105-113.39D” for “G.S. 105-113.40A.” For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Cancer’s IP,” see 96 N.C.L. Rev. 297 (2018).

§ 116-29.1.
University Cancer Research Fund. [Effective July 1, 2022]

Fund. — The University Cancer Research Fund is established as a special revenue fund in the Office of the President of The University of North Carolina. Allocations from the fund shall be made in the discretion of the Cancer Research Fund Committee and shall be used only for the purpose of cancer research under UNC Hospitals, the Lineberger Comprehensive Cancer Center, or both.

Effective July 1 of each calendar year, the funds remitted to the University Cancer Research Fund by the Secretary of Revenue from the tax on tobacco products other than cigarettes pursuant to

G.S. 105-113.39

D are appropriated for this purpose.

Cancer Research Fund Committee. — The Cancer Research Fund Committee shall consist of five ex officio members and two appointed members. The five ex officio members shall consist of the following: (i) one member shall be the Chancellor of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, (ii) one member shall be the Director of the Lineberger Comprehensive Cancer Center, (iii) one member shall be the Dean of the School of Medicine at The University of North Carolina, (iv) one member shall be the Dean of the School of Pharmacy at The University of North Carolina, and (v) one member shall be the Dean of the School of Public Health at The University of North Carolina. The remaining two members shall be appointed by a majority vote of the standing members of the Committee and shall be selected from persons holding a leadership position in a nationally prominent cancer program.If any of the specified positions cease to exist, then the successor position shall be deemed to be substituted in the place of the former one, and the person holding the successor position shall become an ex officio member of the Committee.

Chair. — The chair shall be the Chancellor of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.

Quorum. — A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Meetings. — The Committee shall meet at least once in each quarter and may hold special meetings at any time and place at the call of the chair or upon the written request of at least a majority of its members.

Report. — By November 1 of each year, the Cancer Research Fund Committee shall provide to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and to the Office of State Budget and Management an annual financial report which shall include the following components:

Accounting of expenditures of State funds related to strategic initiatives, development of infrastructure, and ongoing administrative functions.

Accounting of expenditures of extramural funds related to strategic initiatives, development of infrastructure, and ongoing administrative functions.

Measures of impact to the State’s economy in the creation of jobs, intellectual property, and start-up companies.

Other performance measures directly related to the investment of State funds.

Accounting of any fund balances retained by the Fund, along with information about any restrictions on the use of these funds.

History.

2007-323, s. 6.23(b); 2009-451, s. 27A.5(e); 2010-31, s. 9.12; 2011-145, ss. 6.11(c), 9.4; 2013-360, s. 6.4(d); 2021-180, s. 42.9(h).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 42.9(i), made the amendments to subsection (b) of this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 42.9(h), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to sales or purchases occurring on or after that date, and futher provides: “This section does not affect the rights or liabilities of a taxpayer or another person arising under the law as it existed before the effective date of this section, nor does it affect the right to any refund or credit of a tax that accrued under the law as it existed before the effective date of this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 27A.5(e), effective September 1, 2009, substituted “G.S. 105-113.40A” for “G.S. 105-113.41” in subdivision (b)(2).

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 9.12, effective July 1, 2010, in the first paragraph in subsection (c) and in subsection (d), substituted “Chancellor of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill” for “President of The University of North Carolina.”

Session Laws 2011-145, ss. 6.11(c) and 9.4, effective July 1, 2011, rewrote subdivision (b)(1), which formerly read: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 143C-9-3

, of the funds credited to the Tobacco Trust Account, the sum of eight million dollars ($8,000,000) is transferred from the Tobacco Trust Account to the University Cancer Research Fund and appropriated for this purpose” and added subsection (g).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 6.4(d), effective July 1, 2013, rewrote subsection (b).

Session Laws, 2021-180, s. 42.9(h), in subsection (b), substituted “G.S. 105-113.39D” for “G.S. 105-113.40A.” For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Cancer’s IP,” see 96 N.C.L. Rev. 297 (2018).

§ 116-29.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-209, s. 3, effective June 29, 2009.

§ 116-30.
[Repealed]

Transferred to

G.S. 116-40

by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 9.

Part 2A. Fiscal Accountability and Flexibility.

§ 116-30.01.

Recodified as

G.S. 115C-296.4

by Session Laws 2006-66, s. 9.17(c), effective January 1, 2007.

§ 116-30.1.
Special responsibility constituent institutions.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, acting on recommendation made by the President of The University of North Carolina after consultation by him with the State Auditor, may designate one or more constituent institutions of The University as special responsibility constituent institutions. That designation shall be based on an express finding by the Board of Governors that each institution to be so designated has the management staff and internal financial controls that will enable it to administer competently and responsibly all additional management authority and discretion to be delegated to it. The Board of Governors, on recommendation of the President, shall adopt rules prescribing management staffing standards and internal financial controls and safeguards, including the lack of any significant findings in the annual financial audit by the State Auditor’s Office, that must be met by a constituent institution before it may be designated a special responsibility constituent institution and must be maintained in order for it to retain that designation. These rules shall not be designed to prohibit participation by a constituent institution because of its size. These rules shall establish procedures for the President and his staff to review the annual financial audit reports, special reports, electronic data processing reports, performance reports, management letters, or any other report issued by the State Auditor’s Office for each special responsibility constituent institution. The President shall take immediate action regarding reported weaknesses in the internal control structure, deficiencies in the accounting records, and noncompliance with rules and regulations. In any instance where significant findings are identified, the President shall notify the Chancellor of the particular special responsibility constituent institution that the institution must make satisfactory progress in resolving the findings, as determined by the President of The University, after consultation with the State Auditor, within a three-month period commencing with the date of receipt of the published financial audit report, any other audit report, or management letter. If satisfactory progress is not made within a three-month period, the President of The University shall recommend to the Board of Governors at its next meeting that the designation of the particular institution as a special responsibility constituent institution be terminated until such time as the exceptions are resolved to the satisfaction of the President of The University of North Carolina, after consultation with the State Auditor. However, once the designation as a special responsibility constituent institution has been withdrawn by the Board of Governors, reinstatement may not be effective until the beginning of the following fiscal year at the earliest. Any actions taken by the Board of Governors with respect to withdrawal or reinstatement of an institution’s status as a special responsibility constituent institution shall be reported immediately to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee.

The rules established under this section shall include review by the President, after consultation with the State Auditor, the Director of the Office of State Human Resources, and the Director of the Division of State Purchasing and Contracts in ascertaining whether or not a constituent institution has the management staff and internal financial controls to administer the additional authorities authorized under

G.S. 116-30.2

, 116-30.4, and 143-53.1. Such review and consultation must take place no less frequently than once each biennium.

History.

1991, c. 689, s. 206.2(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 10(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.4(k); 1997-71, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 116-30.2.
Appropriations to special responsibility constituent institutions.

All General Fund appropriations made by the General Assembly for continuing operations of a special responsibility constituent institution of The University of North Carolina shall be made in the form of a single sum to each budget code of the institution for each year of the fiscal period for which the appropriations are being made. Notwithstanding

G.S. 143C-6-4

and G.S.120-76(8), each special responsibility constituent institution may expend monies from the overhead receipts special fund budget code and the General Fund monies so appropriated to it in the manner deemed by the Chancellor to be calculated to maintain and advance the programs and services of the institutions, consistent with the directives and policies of the Board of Governors. Special responsibility constituent institutions may transfer appropriations between budget codes. These transfers shall be considered certified even if as a result of agreements between special responsibility constituent institutions. The preparation, presentation, and review of General Fund budget requests of special responsibility constituent institutions shall be conducted in the same manner as are requests of other constituent institutions. The quarterly allotment procedure established pursuant to

G.S. 143C-6-3

shall apply to the General Fund appropriations made for the current operations of each special responsibility constituent institution. All General Fund monies so appropriated to each special responsibility constituent institution shall be recorded, reported, and audited in the same manner as are General Fund appropriations to other constituent institutions.

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-66, s. 9.11(f), effective July 1, 2007.

History.

1991, c. 689, s. 206.2(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 10(a); c. 769, s. 17.6(c); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.4(i); 1997-443, s. 10.8; 2001-449, s. 1; 2004-124, s. 9.6; 2006-66, ss. 9.8, 9.11(e), (f); 2006-203, s. 42.

§ 116-30.3.
Reversions.

Of the General Fund current operations appropriations credit balance remaining at the end of each fiscal year in each of the budget codes listed in this subsection, any amount of the General Fund appropriation for that budget code for that fiscal year (i) may be carried forward to the next fiscal year in that budget code, (ii) is appropriated in that budget code, and (iii) may be used for the purposes set out in subsection (f) of this section. However, the amount carried forward in each budget code under this subsection shall not exceed two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the General Fund appropriation in that budget code. The Director of the Budget, under the authority set forth in

G.S. 143C-6-2

, shall establish the General Fund current operations credit balance remaining in each budget code.

The budget codes that may carry forward a General Fund current operations appropriations credit balance remaining at the end of each fiscal year pursuant to this section are the budget codes for each of the following:

Each special responsibility constituent institution.

The Area Health Education Centers of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.

University of North Carolina System Office Budget Code 16010.

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-212, s. 11(b).

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-212, s. 11(a).

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-212, s. 11(b).

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 11.17(a), effective July 1, 2014.

Funds carried forward pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may be used for one-time expenditures; provided, however, expenditures authorized by this subsection shall not impose additional financial obligations on the State and shall not be used to support positions.

History.

1991, c. 689, s. 206.2(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 10(a); 1995, c. 507, s. 15.16; 1997-443, s. 10.19; 1998-212, s. 11(a), (b); 1999-237, s. 10.14(a); 2006-203, s. 43; 2014-100, s. 11.17(a); 2018-12, s. 2; 2020-81, s. 4(h); 2021-180, s. 8.15.

§ 116-30.3A.
Availability of excess receipts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes, receipts within The University of North Carolina realized in excess of budgeted levels shall be available, up to a maximum of ten percent (10%) above budgeted levels, for each Budget Code, in addition to appropriations to support the operations generating the receipts as approved by the Director of the Budget. Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes, receipts within The University of North Carolina Health Care System realized in excess of budgeted levels shall be available above budgeted levels, for each Budget Code, in addition to appropriations to support the operations generating the receipts as approved by the Director of the Budget.

History.

2006-203, s. 4.

§ 116-30.3B.
Energy conservation savings.

In addition to the funds carried forward under

G.S. 116-30.3

, the General Fund current operations appropriations credit balance remaining at the end of each fiscal year for utilities of a constituent institution that is energy savings realized from implementing an energy conservation measure shall be carried forward by the institution to the next fiscal year. Sixty percent (60%) of the energy savings realized shall be utilized for energy conservation measures by that institution. The use of funds under this section shall be limited to onetime capital and operating expenditures that will not impose additional financial obligations on the State. The Director of the Budget, under the authority set forth in

G.S. 143C-6-2

, shall establish the General Fund current operations credit balance remaining in each budget code of each institution.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that appropriations to the Board of Governors on behalf of a constituent institution not be reduced as a result of the institution’s realization of energy savings. Instead, the General Assembly intends that the amount of appropriations be determined as if no energy savings had been realized. The Director of the Budget shall not decrease the recommended base budget requirements for utilities for constituent institutions by the amount of energy savings realized from implementing energy conservation measures, including savings achieved through a guaranteed energy savings contract.

Constituent institutions shall submit annual reports on the use of funds authorized pursuant to this section as required under

G.S. 143-64.12

.

As used in this section, “energy savings,” “guaranteed energy savings contract,” and “energy conservation measure” have the same meaning as in

G.S. 143-64.17

.

History.

2010-196, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 9.6D(c); 2014-100, s. 6.4(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 9.6D(c), effective July 1, 2011, added the first two sentences in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 6.4(e), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “base budget” for “continuation budget” in the second sentence of subsection (b). See Editor’s note for applicability.

§ 116-30.4.
Position management.

The Chancellor of a special responsibility constituent institution, when he finds that to do so would help to maintain and advance the programs and services of the institution, may establish and abolish positions, acting in accordance with:

State personnel policies and procedures if these positions are subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act and if the institution is operating under the terms of a Performance Agreement or a Decentralization Agreement authorized under Chapter 126 of the General Statutes; or

Policies and procedures of the Board of Governors if these positions are exempt from the North Carolina Human Resources Act.

The results achieved by establishing and abolishing positions pursuant to the conditions set forth in subdivision (1) of this section shall be subject to postauditing by the Office of State Human Resources. Implementation of personnel actions shall be subject to the availability of funds within the institution’s current budget to fund the full annualized costs of these actions.

History.

1991, c. 689, s. 206.2(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 10(a); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 116-30.5.
Impact on education.

The Board of Governors shall require each special responsibility constituent institution to include in its institutional effectiveness plan those assessment measures that are determined by the Board to be measures that will assure some standard measure of student learning and development in general undergraduate education at the special responsibility constituent institutions. The intent of this requirement is to measure the impact of

G.S. 116-30.1

through

G.S. 116-30.5

, establishing and administering special responsibility constituent institutions, and their implementation on undergraduate student learning and development.

History.

1991, c. 689, s. 206.2(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 10(a).

§ 116-30.6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-322, s. 6, effective July 30, 2007.

§ 116-30.7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-80, s. 2.7, effective July 8, 2021.

History.

2008-107, s. 9.15; 2009-451, s. 9.11; 2014-100, s. 6.4(f); 2015-241, s. 11.14; 2018-12, s. 3; repealed by 2021-80, s. 2.7, effective July 8, 2021.

§ 116-30.8.
Special responsibility constituent institutions: annual audit by State Auditor.

Each special responsibility constituent institution shall be audited annually by the State Auditor. The audit shall be provided to the Chancellor and Board of Trustees of the special responsibility institution, and the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina. The audit shall also be included in the State’s Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR).

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall ensure that all special responsibility constituent institutions are audited in accordance with this section.

History.

2011-145, s. 9.16; 2012-142, s. 17.2; 2013-373, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 17.2, effective July 1, 2012, inserted the third sentence in the first paragraph of the section.

Session Laws 2013-373, s. 2, effective October 1, 2013, deleted “or certified public accountant” at the end of the section heading; and, in the first paragraph, added “by the State Auditor” at the end of the first sentence, deleted the former second and third sentences, which read “The Chancellor of the special responsibility constituent institution may use State funds to contract with the State Auditor or with a certified public accountant to perform the audit. The contract for audit services may be for up to three years in duration,” and in the present second sentence, inserted “and” preceding “the Board of Governors” and deleted “and the State Auditor” at the end.

§§ 116-30.9 through 116-30.19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2B. Private, Nonprofit Corporations.

§ 116-30.20.
Establishment of private, nonprofit corporations.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall encourage the establishment of private, nonprofit corporations to support the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and The University System. The President of The University of North Carolina and the chancellors of the constituent institutions may assign employees to assist with the establishment and operation of a nonprofit corporation and may make available to the corporation office space, equipment, supplies, and other related resources; provided, the sole purpose of the corporation is to support The University of North Carolina or one or more of its constituent institutions.

The board of directors of each such private, nonprofit corporation shall secure and pay for the services of The University System’s internal auditors or employ a certified public accountant to conduct an audit of the financial accounts of the corporation. The board of directors shall transmit to the Board of Governors a copy of the annual financial audit report of the private, nonprofit corporation.

History.

2005-276, s. 9.22.

Editor's Note.

Section
2021-180, s. 8.24(a)-(d), provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Postsecondary enrollment has declined during the COVID-19 pandemic, particularly among low-income and minority students

“(2) Providing a digital learning option for postsecondary education is critical to reach students who were forced off campus and into the workforce by education changes caused by the COVID-19 pandemic.

“(3) The University of North Carolina is well-positioned to provide enhanced postsecondary learning and career advancement opportunities to citizens of this State.

“(4) It is of salient importance that higher education in North Carolina generate postsecondary learning and career advancement opportunities for individuals whose postsecondary education was impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic.

“(5) It is vital for The University of North Carolina to immediately work toward (i) enhancing digital learning programs offered by the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and (ii) meeting postsecondary attainment goals consistent with

G.S. 116C-10

, which sets the goal that 2,000,000 residents between the ages of 25 and 44 will have completed a high-quality credential or postsecondary degree by 2030.

“(b) Of the funds appropriated in this act from the State Fiscal Recovery Fund to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina for the 2021-2022 fiscal year, the sum of ninety-seven million dollars ($97,000,000) shall be allocated to support digital learning and career development programs offered by constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina through the Project Kitty Hawk public-private partnership (Project Kitty Hawk).

“(c) Project Kitty Hawk shall be conducted by a nonprofit corporation created in accordance with this section and

G.S. 116-30.20

. The nonprofit corporation shall include in its corporate bylaws that the organization will be governed by a board of directors consisting of nine members, as follows:

“(1) Two ex officio voting members as follows:

“a. The President of The University of North Carolina.

“b. The Chair of the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina.

“(2) Seven voting members appointed by the Board of Governors, in consultation with the President of The University of North Carolina, as follows:

“a. Three members who shall be chancellors or chief academic officers of constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina.

“b. Four members who shall be individuals having experience in business management, higher education, or both.

“(d) Beginning March 1, 2022, and annually thereafter:

“(1) The nonprofit corporation board of directors shall report to the General Assembly on its activities, corporate performance, and any other relevant matters pertaining to its corporate mission.

“(2) The University of North Carolina System Office shall report to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Education/Higher Education, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division regarding the public-private partnership established under this section and the progress made toward reaching the State's digital learning attainment goals. The report shall include information on the development and implementation of online degree programs in collaboration with constituent institutions, including participation by constituent institutions, student demographics for course enrollment, tuition receipts and fees for online courses, and completion of student degree programs through digital courses by institution.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Part 3. Constituent Institutions.